Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 5.1-7.3.
Duty of care and liability for damages of owners of private landing areas.

For the purposes of this section:“Fee” means any payment or payments of money to a landowner for use of the premises or in order to engage in any activity described in subsections B and C, but does not include any action taken by another to improve the land or access to the land for the purposes set forth in subsections B and C or to remedy damage caused by such uses.“Land” or “premises” means any privately owned area for landing any aircraft, that is not open to the general public, and that is registered with the Department and the Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to § 5.1-7.2.“Landowner” means the legal title holder, lessee, occupant, or any other person in control of the land or premises.

A landowner shall not be liable for ordinary negligence related to conditions on his premises that proximately cause damage to property or injury to occupants of an aircraft or ultralight vehicle landing on or taking off from such premises, provided that no commercial operation is being conducted on or about the premises.

Any landowner who gives permission, express or implied, to another person to operate aircraft or ultralight vehicles of any type for the personal use of such person or for the use of an easement as set forth in subsection B does not thereby:

Impliedly or expressly represent that the premises are safe for such purposes;

Grant invitee status or its corresponding duty of care to the person to whom such permission has been granted; or

Assume responsibility for or incur liability for any intentional or negligent acts of such person or any other person, except as provided in subsection D.

Nothing contained in this section shall limit the liability of a landowner that may otherwise arise or exist by reason of his gross negligence or willful or malicious failure to guard or warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity. The provisions of this section shall not limit the liability of a landowner that may otherwise arise or exist when the landowner receives a fee for use of the premises or to engage in any activity described in subsection B or C. Nothing contained in this section shall relieve any landowner who sponsors or conducts any event or competition of the duty to exercise ordinary care in such events.

History.

2012, c. 302.

§ 5.1-8.
Repealed by Acts 1995, cc. 682 and 690, effective October 1, 1995.

§ 5.1-9.
Disposition of fees.

All fees or sums collected by the Department under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the special fund created by § 5.1-51.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-9; 1966, c. 576; 1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-9.1.
Certain privately owned airports declared to be works of public improvement; exemption from local taxation authorized.

Any public use privately owned airport in this Commonwealth, or any improvements made thereto, which is open to the public at no charge and which has been licensed by the Department is hereby declared to be a work of internal improvement.

The governing body of any city, town or county in this Commonwealth is authorized to exempt from local taxation, as an inducement to their location, the runways and taxiways of any privately owned, public use airport, which is available to the public at no charge and which has been licensed by the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-9.1; 1966, c. 221; 1970, c. 717; 1979, c. 272; 1980, c. 721.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1966 act having assigned no number.

§ 5.1-9.2.
Contract carriers; permit and registration required.

No person shall operate or engage in the business of a contract carrier by aircraft intrastate in the airspace of this Commonwealth unless such person has secured from the Department a permit authorizing him to conduct such operation or to engage in such business and has registered under § 5.1-5 all aircraft used in this Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 5.1-103; 1970, c. 708; 1979, c. 357; 1980, c. 721; 2017, c. 793.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793 substituted “registered” for “licensed.”

§ 5.1-9.3.
Same; application for permit; fee; action of Department.

Any person desiring a permit under this chapter shall file with the Department an application in the form prescribed by the Department with a fee of fifty dollars. Such application shall contain a promise of compliance by the applicant with the provisions of this title and with the lawful rules and regulations of the Department governing the operations of contract carriers by aircraft in the airspace of the Commonwealth. Such application may be filed with the Department by the applicant in person or transmitted by registered mail. Upon being satisfied that the provisions of this chapter and the lawful rules and regulations of the Department adopted pursuant hereto, which are prerequisite to the granting of a permit, have been complied with, the Department shall issue such permit to such applicant, subject to such terms, limitations and restrictions as the Department may deem proper, without further proceedings.

History.

Code 1950, § 5.1-104; 1970, c. 708; 1972, c. 232; 1980, c. 721.

§ 5.1-9.4.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 45.

§ 5.1-9.5.
Contract carriers; bonds, insurance or certificate of insurance required prior to issuance of registration or permit; securities deposited in lieu thereof.

No registration or permit shall be issued by the Department to any contract carrier by aircraft until and after such contract carrier has filed with the Department an insurance policy, a bond underwritten by an insurer, or certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, which certificate shall certify that such policy or bond covers the liability of such contract carrier in accordance with the provisions of this statute.

Such policy, bond or certificate of insurance shall be issued or underwritten only by an insurer approved or authorized to do business in Virginia, or by one who is eligible as a surplus lines insurer pursuant to Chapter 48 (§

38.2-4805.1

et seq.) of Title 38.2, and shall be in amounts not less than the following minimum limits: liability for bodily injury to or death of any one person, passenger or other, aboard the aircraft; $75,000, liability for each occurrence in any one aircraft of at least an amount equal to the sum produced by multiplying $75,000 by seventy-five percent of the total number of passenger seats installed in the aircraft; and liability for loss or damage to cargo owned by others than the insured of at least $10,000 for each occurrence. However, the holder of a registration or permit issued by the Department shall not be required to file any cargo insurance, bond, or bonds for cargo liability for the hauling of property transported under contract.

In no event shall the limits required herein for contract carriers be less than those prescribed for like carriers by the Civil Aeronautics Board or the Federal Aviation Administration or their successors.

In lieu of such policy, underwritten bond or certificate of insurance, a contract carrier may, with the consent of the Department, submit bonds, in an amount approved by the Department, of the United States of America, the Commonwealth of Virginia, or of any municipality of this Commonwealth as security for its bond. Such federal, state, or municipal bonds shall be deposited with the State Treasurer, and shall not be reduced in amount, pledged as security, or otherwise encumbered for any other purpose during the life of such registration or permit, except with the prior written approval of the Department.

History.

1980, c. 721; 2017, c. 793.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “38.2-4805.1” was substituted for “38.2-4800” in subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793 substituted “registration” for “license” throughout the section.

§ 5.1-9.6.
Same; duration and custody of bonds, etc.

Insurance policies, bonds, certificates of insurance, or federal, state, or municipal bonds filed with the Department shall be kept in full force at all times. The policy, bond, or certificate of insurance shall remain in the custody of the Department six months after the insurance or bond has expired or has been canceled for any cause. If federal, state, or municipal bonds are deposited with the State Treasurer as security, such bonds shall remain so deposited until six months after the authority for use of equipment insured has expired or is cancelled for any cause, unless otherwise ordered by the Department.

History.

1980, c. 721.

§ 5.1-9.7.
Same; condition of bond, etc.

The insurance bond, or other security, shall obligate the insurer or surety to pay any final judgment for damages sustained by the passengers, shippers, or consignees for injury to any passenger or passengers, or for loss or damage to property entrusted to such contract carrier when a cargo policy is required, and for any and all injuries to persons and loss of, or damage to, property resulting from the negligent operation of any aircraft.

History.

1980, c. 721.

§ 5.1-9.8.
Same; effect of failure to give or maintain adequate security.

Failure of any contract carrier holding a registration or permit issued by and under the authority of the Department to comply with any of the provisions of §§ 5.1-9.5 through 5.1-9.7 shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor and punishable as such.

History.

1980, c. 721; 2017, c. 793.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793 substituted “registration” for “license.”

§ 5.1-9.9.
Same; duration of permits; suspension or revocation; penalty.

Contract carrier permits issued pursuant to this chapter shall be effective from the date of issuance and shall remain in effect only so long as the contract carrier’s insurance, underwritten bond or certificate of insurance required by § 5.1-9.5 remains in full force and effect.

The Department may suspend or revoke such permit for violation of any of the aviation laws of this Commonwealth or of the United States of America, or for violation of any of the rules and regulations of the Virginia Aviation Board.

Willful misrepresentation of any material fact in obtaining a contract carrier permit shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor and punishable as such.

History.

1980, c. 721.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 5.1-10.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-11.
Government-owned aircraft.

This article shall not apply to public aircraft owned by the United States but shall apply to all other public aircraft.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-14; 1966, c. 576; 1980, c. 721.

§ 5.1-12.
Federally certificated airlines and interstate service.

This article shall not apply to any aircraft operated by any air carrier operating under Federal Aviation Regulation Part 121 or Part 135 if operating with an exemption from Title IV of the Federal Aviation Act to provide scheduled passenger service.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-14; 1966, c. 576; 1980, c. 721; 1988, c. 45; 1991, c. 535.